Hawaii statutes.
§291D-6 Answer required. (a) A
person who receives a notice of traffic infraction shall answer the notice
within twenty-one days of the date of issuance of the notice. There shall be
included with the notice of traffic infraction a preaddressed envelope directed
to the traffic violations bureau of the applicable district court.

(b) Provided that the notice of traffic
infraction does not require an appearance in person at [a] hearing as set forth
in section [291D-5(d)(10)], in answering a notice of traffic infraction, a
person shall have the following options:

(1) Admit the commission of the infraction in one of
the following ways:

(A) By mail or in person, by completing the
appropriate portion of the notice of traffic infraction or preaddressed envelope
and submitting it to the authority specified on the notice together with
payment of the total amount stated on the notice of traffic infraction.
Payment by mail shall be in the form of a check, money order, or by an approved
credit or debit card. Payment in person shall be in the form of United States
currency, check, money order, or by an approved credit or debit card; or

(B) Via the Internet or by telephone, by
submitting payment of the total amount stated on the notice of traffic
infraction. Payment via the Internet or by telephone shall be by an approved
credit or debit card;

(2) Deny the commission of the infraction and request
a hearing to contest the infraction by completing the appropriate portion of
the notice of traffic infraction or preaddressed envelope and submitting it,
either by mail or in person, to the authority specified on the notice. In lieu
of appearing in person at a hearing, the person may submit a written statement
of grounds on which the person contests the notice of traffic infraction, which
shall be considered by the court as a statement given in court pursuant to
section 291D-8(a); or

(3) Admit the commission of the infraction and
request a hearing to explain circumstances mitigating the infraction by
completing the appropriate portion of the notice of traffic infraction or
preaddressed envelope and submitting it, either by mail or in person, to the
authority specified on the notice. In lieu of appearing in person at a
hearing, the person may submit a written explanation of the mitigating
circumstances, which shall be considered by the court as a statement given in
court pursuant to section 291D-8(b).

(c) When answering the notice of traffic
infraction, the person shall affix the person's signature to the answer and shall
state the address at which the person will accept future mailings from the
court. No other response shall constitute an answer for purposes of this
chapter. [L 1993, c 214, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 4, §1; am L 2005, c 48, §3; am
L 2007, c 85, §5]

Rules of Court

Answer, see HCTR rule 8.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next